Hawaii statutes.
§183D-25 Licenses; display thereof. No
person to whom a hunting license has been issued shall permit any other person
to carry, display, or use the license in any way. Every person to whom a
hunting license has been issued shall physically possess the license when
hunting and shall show the license upon the demand of any officer authorized to
enforce the game laws of the State. No person, upon the request of an officer,
shall refuse to show the license or withhold permission to inspect the person's
game bag, container, hunting coat or jacket, or carrier, or vehicle of any kind
where game might be concealed. [L 1985, c 174, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next